lexc/noun/enhucske.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 

      
LEXICON Root
Noun;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Nounik;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Nounik;
+Pref+:széjjel   Nounik;
+Pref+:szembe   Nounik;
+Pref+:szerte   Nounik;
+Pref+:vissza   Nounik;
+Pref+:helyre   Nounik;
+Pref+:tovább   Nounik;
+Pref+:tönkre   Nounik;
+Pref+:észre   Nounik;
+Pref+:rajta   Nounik;
+Pref+:előre   Nounik;
+Pref+:félbe   Nounik;
+Pref+:félre   Nounik;
+Pref+:felül   Nounik;
+Pref+:fölül   Nounik;
+Pref+:agyon   Nounik;
+Pref+:ellen   Nounik;
+Pref+:körbe   Nounik;
+Pref+:körül   Nounik;
+Pref+:közbe   Nounik;
+Pref+:közre   Nounik;
+Pref+:külön   Nounik;
+Pref+:utána   Nounik;
+Pref+:végbe   Nounik;
+Pref+:végig   Nounik;
+Pref+:hátra   Nounik;
+Pref+:hozzá   Nounik;
+Pref+:egybe   Nounik;
+Pref+:ketté   Nounik;
+Pref+:össze   Nounik;
+Pref+:mellé   Nounik;
+Pref+:által   Nounik;
+Pref+:alul   Nounik;
+Pref+:haza   Nounik;
+Pref+:újra   Nounik;
+Pref+:abba   Nounik;
+Pref+:neki   Nounik;
+Pref+:bele   Nounik;
+Pref+:újjá   Nounik;
+Pref+:benn   Nounik;
+Pref+:fenn   Nounik;
+Pref+:fönn   Nounik;
+Pref+:jóvá   Nounik;
+Pref+:szét   Nounik;
+Pref+:tele   Nounik;
+Pref+:tova   Nounik;
+Pref+:meg   Nounik;
+Pref+:oda   Nounik;
+Pref+:elő   Nounik;
+Pref+:túl   Nounik;
+Pref+:alá   Nounik;
+Pref+:föl   Nounik;
+Pref+:ide   Nounik;
+Pref+:fel   Nounik;
+Pref+:rá   Nounik;
+Pref+:ki   Nounik;
+Pref+:le   Nounik;
+Pref+:el   Nounik;
+Pref+:át   Nounik;
+Pref+:be   Nounik;
            Nounik;

LEXICON Nounik
Aires-icske AddNoun;
Angeles-icske AddNoun;
Antika AddNoun;
Aral-tavicska AddNoun;
Bajkál-tavicska AddNoun;
Braunka AddNoun;
Budějovice-icske AddNoun;
Ce-tung-icska AddNoun;
Dnyeszterecske AddNoun;
Dunácska AddNoun;
EU-belicske AddNoun;
Edécske AddNoun;
Erasmus-icska AddNoun;
Erie-tavicska AddNoun;
Franciscó-icska AddNoun;
Fu-ce-icska AddNoun;
FÁK-belicske AddNoun;
Gerzsonka AddNoun;
Gogh-icska AddNoun;
Holmes-icska AddNoun;
Huron-tavicska AddNoun;
István-icska AddNoun;
Janeiró-icska AddNoun;
Jolika AddNoun;
Kaszpi-mélyföldicske AddNoun;
Kaszpi-tengericske AddNoun;
Katalinka AddNoun;
LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor

LEXICON Noun
acélozódottacska AddNoun;
afeletticske AddNoun;
agyafúrtacska AddNoun;
akasztófáravalócska AddNoun;
akózásocska AddNoun;
algoritmizálócska AddNoun;
almenücske AddNoun;
aláztatásocska AddNoun;
anekdotázottacska AddNoun;
antiklerikalizmusocska AddNoun;
aperitívumocska AddNoun;
archaizálásocska AddNoun;
asszonyságocska AddNoun;
auktoritásocska AddNoun;
azúrocska AddNoun;
balesetecske AddNoun;
barbárításocska AddNoun;
bazseválásocska AddNoun;
beretváltacska AddNoun;
bicskázócska AddNoun;
biológusocska AddNoun;
bizonyítócska AddNoun;
bogarasíthatócska AddNoun;
boltozatosacska AddNoun;
bornemisszásításocska AddNoun;
borúsítandócska AddNoun;
brokkolicska AddNoun;
bukósisakocska AddNoun;
bácsikácska AddNoun;
bárányfelhőcske AddNoun;
béresgyerekecske AddNoun;
böködésecske AddNoun;
büfögésecske AddNoun;
bűnösködésecske AddNoun;
cenzúrázatlanodhatócska AddNoun;
cikkecske AddNoun;
cirmosodhatócska AddNoun;
csalitocska AddNoun;
csattintócska AddNoun;
csendíthetőcske AddNoun;
cserkészecske AddNoun;
csiklandásocska AddNoun;
csiperkécske AddNoun;
csomagpostácska AddNoun;
csukolhatócska AddNoun;
csíkosíthatócska AddNoun;
csöngésecske AddNoun;
csücsülésecske AddNoun;
cégecske AddNoun;
dakotaellenesecske AddNoun;
definíciócska AddNoun;
demilitarizálhatócska AddNoun;
desszertecske AddNoun;
diagonálhatócska AddNoun;
digózásocska AddNoun;
diszjunkciócska AddNoun;
dobozkácska AddNoun;
domesztikálódottacska AddNoun;
dróttalanítócska AddNoun;
durrantacska AddNoun;
délicske AddNoun;
döcögtetendőcske AddNoun;
dúdolgathatócska AddNoun;
eddegélendőcske AddNoun;
egyensúlyozócska AddNoun;
egyéniesülőcske AddNoun;
eleganciácska AddNoun;
ellenreakciócska AddNoun;
elvtársiasítottacska AddNoun;
embertelenedhetőcske AddNoun;
energiaigényesítőcske AddNoun;
erdőcsőszöcske AddNoun;
erősbödésecske AddNoun;
eszközvonzatocska AddNoun;
evakuálócska AddNoun;
extrémedésecske AddNoun;
fagyizásocska AddNoun;
falhatócska AddNoun;
farkincácska AddNoun;
fegyelmezetlenkedésecske AddNoun;
fejletecske AddNoun;
feleselendőcske AddNoun;
fenségesítőcske AddNoun;
feszesedésecske AddNoun;
filiszterecske AddNoun;
firtatottacska AddNoun;
flottodásocska AddNoun;
foglalatlanítandócska AddNoun;
foldottacska AddNoun;
fontoskodócska AddNoun;
forrtacska AddNoun;
frakcionálótornyocska AddNoun;
fullasztandócska AddNoun;
fádacska AddNoun;
félcédulásítandócska AddNoun;
fémesecske AddNoun;
fésűcsigácska AddNoun;
förgetegecske AddNoun;
fülészecske AddNoun;
főhősöcske AddNoun;
fűzetendőcske AddNoun;
gatyásodásocska AddNoun;
geostacionáriusacska AddNoun;
globalitásocska AddNoun;
gondolkozottacska AddNoun;
gubancosítócska AddNoun;
gyalogságocska AddNoun;
gyermekiesítőcske AddNoun;
gyámolatlanodócska AddNoun;
gyöngykölesecske AddNoun;
gyűjtögethetőcske AddNoun;
gépeltecske AddNoun;
gördülékenyecske AddNoun;
habfehérecske AddNoun;
hajcsikáltacska AddNoun;
hajóorsócska AddNoun;
halványbordócska AddNoun;
hangosodásocska AddNoun;
harapósítócska AddNoun;
hasonlítottacska AddNoun;
határidősíthetőcske AddNoun;
hazátlanacska AddNoun;
helykitöltőcske AddNoun;
heroinocska AddNoun;
hibridizálhatócska AddNoun;
hintendőcske AddNoun;
hittérítésecske AddNoun;
homonímiácska AddNoun;
horrorisztikusacska AddNoun;
humanizmusocska AddNoun;
háborítottacska AddNoun;
hármasacska AddNoun;
házilagosacska AddNoun;
hívatócska AddNoun;
húrosíthatócska AddNoun;
hőskölteményecske AddNoun;
identifikálásocska AddNoun;
igazultacska AddNoun;
illendőcske AddNoun;
importőröcske AddNoun;
indusztrializálhatócska AddNoun;
inkollegiálisacska AddNoun;
intettecske AddNoun;
irigyeltecske AddNoun;
istenesítendőcske AddNoun;
izgalmasításocska AddNoun;
javaslatocska AddNoun;
jellegzetesítettecske AddNoun;
juházhatócska AddNoun;
jégpatkócska AddNoun;
kabard-balkárföldicske AddNoun;
kalauzocska AddNoun;
kanalazandócska AddNoun;
kapcsosítócska AddNoun;
kardlapozhatócska AddNoun;
kasztocska AddNoun;
keccselhetőcske AddNoun;
kellemesítőcske AddNoun;
kenuzottacska AddNoun;
kergülésecske AddNoun;
kevesbítésecske AddNoun;
kinematikusacska AddNoun;
kisközösségecske AddNoun;
klimatizáltacska AddNoun;
koedukáltacska AddNoun;
kommandócska AddNoun;
komámasszonyocska AddNoun;
konkretizálandócska AddNoun;
konyhatündérke AddNoun;
koravénítésecske AddNoun;
korongozásocska AddNoun;
kosztümözésecske AddNoun;
kreatívulhatócska AddNoun;
kukkoldácska AddNoun;
kunyorálandócska AddNoun;
kutymorgásocska AddNoun;
káprázandócska AddNoun;
kékellendőcske AddNoun;
képesítőzhetőcske AddNoun;
késetőcske AddNoun;
kévézésecske AddNoun;
kóborogandócska AddNoun;
kölcseysocska AddNoun;
könyörögőcske AddNoun;
köszöntésecske AddNoun;
kövérítésecske AddNoun;
közévágócska AddNoun;
különnyomatocska AddNoun;
ladikázócska AddNoun;
lantornásacska AddNoun;
lazsálásocska AddNoun;
lektorálócska AddNoun;
lepődöttecske AddNoun;
liberalizálásocska AddNoun;
litotrófacska AddNoun;
lomposítandócska AddNoun;
lumineszcensecske AddNoun;
láncolatocska AddNoun;
lépcsőzetecske AddNoun;
macskázásocska AddNoun;
majoritásocska AddNoun;
markírozottacska AddNoun;
melyecske AddNoun;
metonímiásítottacska AddNoun;
misztikusodottacska AddNoun;
morcoskodócska AddNoun;
multimodálisodásocska AddNoun;
másoddiplomásításocska AddNoun;
mézesmázosodottacska AddNoun;
nagykutyácska AddNoun;
nefrológiácska AddNoun;
neutronocska AddNoun;
nyargalászásocska AddNoun;
nyomatékoltacska AddNoun;
nyúzatandócska AddNoun;
nőbolondocska AddNoun;
oldhatatlanacska AddNoun;
oroszlánszívűsítendőcske AddNoun;
padlatocska AddNoun;
parancsnoklóságocska AddNoun;
patvarkodócska AddNoun;
periszkopikusacska AddNoun;
pillogásocska AddNoun;
planírozócska AddNoun;
pollenérzékenyítettecske AddNoun;
povedáltacska AddNoun;
propozíciócska AddNoun;
pukkaszthatócska AddNoun;
pártoskodócska AddNoun;
pökdösöttecske AddNoun;
rakatandócska AddNoun;
regisztrálócska AddNoun;
reneszánszkoriságocska AddNoun;
rezesíthetőcske AddNoun;
robusztusacska AddNoun;
rovancsolhatócska AddNoun;
rántatócska AddNoun;
röfögöttecske AddNoun;
sarjasztandócska AddNoun;
senyvedésecske AddNoun;
sisakfödelecske AddNoun;
sorosítócska AddNoun;
statuálandócska AddNoun;
sunyítottacska AddNoun;
szakosodócska AddNoun;
szcenírozásocska AddNoun;
szelvényutalványocska AddNoun;
szentévecske AddNoun;
szeszmérőcske AddNoun;
szipolyozottacska AddNoun;
szomjúhozásocska AddNoun;
szundíthatócska AddNoun;
számlálatlanodottacska AddNoun;
székelhetőcske AddNoun;
szívódandócska AddNoun;
szövőszékecske AddNoun;
sártalaníthatócska AddNoun;
súlyemelésecske AddNoun;
talajlazítócska AddNoun;
tarlózhatócska AddNoun;
tektonikusacska AddNoun;
teremtettecske AddNoun;
tetszetősödhetőcske AddNoun;
titkosulásocska AddNoun;
torkosítandócska AddNoun;
trevirácska AddNoun;
tulipántosulhatócska AddNoun;
tárgyiasítottacska AddNoun;
tétetendőcske AddNoun;
töppesztethetőcske AddNoun;
türelmetlenedésecske AddNoun;
ultrabalosodottacska AddNoun;
utórezgésecske AddNoun;
valószínűtlenedhetőcske AddNoun;
vendégszerepelendőcske AddNoun;
vetődésecske AddNoun;
villanyozódócska AddNoun;
viszketőcske AddNoun;
vonítócska AddNoun;
városatyácska AddNoun;
vérezőcske AddNoun;
vőcske AddNoun;
zsarnokacska AddNoun;
zuppanhatócska AddNoun;
ábrándulócska AddNoun;
álokocska AddNoun;
áskálhatócska AddNoun;
élelmezettecske AddNoun;
érleltecske AddNoun;
írogathatócska AddNoun;
öldöklésecske AddNoun;
öreganyácska AddNoun;
ösztövérítendőcske AddNoun;
üdvösíthetőcske AddNoun;
ődöngésecske AddNoun;
